src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON reflobl
!The plural
 +Pl+Gen:ietja%>j   PxCiPlstem ;
 +Pl+Acc:ietja%>jd  PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Ine:ietja%>jn  PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Ela:ietja%>jst PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Com:ietja%>jn  PxCPlstem ;


!Singular
!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Ine.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Ine.
 +Sg+Acc:iehtja%> PxV1 ; !First person 
 +Sg+Gen:iehtja%> PxV1 ; !First person
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietjam K ; !Exceptional Sg1
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietjam K ; !Exceptional Sg1
 +Sg+Acc+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietjama K ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietjama K ;
 +Sg+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietjama K ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietjama K ;

 +Sg+Acc:ietja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Gen:ietja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:iehtja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:iehtja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Ill:iehtja%>s PxCi ; !gives -im and -it instead of-am and -at
 +Sg+Ill:alla%>s PxCi ; ! 
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:iehtja%>s PxC ; ! -iehtjasam and iehtjasat
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:alla%>s PxC ; ! -allasam and allasat
 +Sg+Ine:ietja%>n PxC ;
 +Sg+Ela:ietja%>st PxC ; !
 +Sg+Com:ietja%>jn PxC ;

   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:iehtjame K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxDu2:ietjade  K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:iehtjame K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:ietjade  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:ietjame  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu2:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:ietjame  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxDu1:iehtjame K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxDu2:ietjade  K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:iehtjame K ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:ietjade  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxDu1:ietjame  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxDu2:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:ietjame  K ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me 


LEXICON PxCiPlstem
 +PxDu1:ma  K ;
 +PxDu1:me  K ;
 +PxDu2:da  K ;
 +PxDu3:ska K ;
 +PxPl1:ma  K ;
 +PxPl2:da  K ;
 +PxPl3:sa  K ;

LEXICON PxCPlstem
 +PxDu1:imme  K ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K ;
 +PxDu3:iska  K ;
 +PxPl1:imme  K ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K ;
 +PxPl3:isá   K ;



!LEXICON refloblsg ! what is this lexicon? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Gen+PxSg1:iehtja%>m         NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg1:ietja%>m          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg2:ietja%>t          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg2++Err/Orth:iehtja%>t  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg3:ietja%>s          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>s  NAMÁK ;

! +Gen+PxDu1:iehtja%>ma          NAMÁK ; !
! +Gen+PxDu1++Err/Orth:ietja%>ma  NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG:iehtja%>me   NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietja%>me   NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu2:ietja%>da           NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG:ietja%>de    NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>da  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>de  NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu3:ietja%>ska          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>ska NAMÁK ;
 
! +Gen+PxPl1:iehtja%>ma        NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG:iehtja%>me        NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietja%>ma         NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietja%>me         NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>da        NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>de        NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl2:ietja%>da         NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl2+Use/NG:ietja%>de         NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>sa        NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxPl3:ietja%>sa  NAMÁK ;


!LEXICON refloblpl ! what is this lexicon? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jme  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jska NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jsa  NAMÁK ;


! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON oblintercas
          +Sg+Gen:an      K ;
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
          +Sg+Acc:av      K ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc:avva    K-s ;   ! betong
          +Sg+Ill:asi     K-s ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:asás    K-s ;   ! dial
   +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:asá     K-s ;   ! dial
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:asa     K-s ;   !
     +Sg+Ill+Attr:an      K ;
     +Sg+Ine+Attr:an      K ;
          +Sg+Com:ajna    K-s ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Com:ajnas   K-s ;    ! dial
          +Sg+Par:at      K-s ;
          
          +Pl+Nom:a%>     K-s ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Nom:aha     K-s ; !
          +Pl+Gen:aj      K ;
!   +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:j      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
          +Pl+Acc:ajt     K ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Acc:e%>jt   K ; 
          +Pl+Ill:ajda    K-s ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ill:e%>jda  K-s ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ine:ajn     K-s ; !N&J
          +Pl+Ine:ajna    K-s ;!Spiik ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ela:ajs     K ;
          +Pl+Ela:ajsta   K ; !Spiik ! 
          +Pl+Com:aj      K ;
             +Ess:anen    K ;
      +Use/NG+Ess:an'na   K-s ; !dial 
      +Use/NG+Ess:an'nas  K-s ; !dial
      
  !        +Sg+Abe:n#da  K ; !Must be mandá and this is strange.
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dak  K ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dagi K ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dagá K ; ! 
  +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:an#tagá K ; ! 
  !       +Pl+Abe:jda    K ; !Must be majdá and this is stange
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdak   K ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdagi  K ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdagá  K ; ! 
  +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ajtagá  K ; ! 


LEXICON oblintercas_guhti
         +Sg+Gen:n      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Acc:v      K ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Acc:vva    K-s ; ! betont
         +Sg+Ill:si     K-s ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:sis    K-s ; ! dial
  +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:sá     K-s ;   ! dial
         +Sg+Com:jna    K-s ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Com:jnas   K-s ; ! 
         +Sg+Par:t      K-s ;
         +Pl+Gen:j      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:j      NAMÁK ; ! why to NAMÁK? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Pl+Acc:jt     K ;
         +Pl+Ill:jda    K-s ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Ine:jn     K-s ; !N&J !gielaj hilá
         +Pl+Ine:jna    K-s ;!Spiik 
         +Pl+Ela:js     K ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Ela:jsta   K ; 
         +Pl+Com:j      K ;
!        +Sg+Abe:n#da   K ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dak  K ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dagi K ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dagá K ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:n#tagá K ; ! 
 !       +Pl+Abe:jda    K ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdak   K ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdagi  K ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdagá  K ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:jtagá  K ; ! 

 

LEXICON idiosyncmij
        +Nom:a%>     K-s ;
 +Use/NG+Nom:aha     K-s ; ! 
        +Gen:aj      K ; 
! +Use/NG+Gen:aj      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
 +Use/NG+Acc:e%>jt   K ; 
        +Acc:a%>jt   K ; 
        +Ill:e%>jda  K-s ;
!       +Ine:a%>jna  K-s ;
        +Ine:a%>jn   K ;
        +Ela:a%>jsta K-s ;
 +Use/NG+Ela:a%>js   K ; ! 
 ! +Abe:ajda  K ;            ! covered in non-idiosync   
! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdak  K ;  ! covered in non-idiosync   
! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdagi  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   
! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdagá  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   
! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jtagá  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   

LEXICON goabbácase
         +Sg+Nom:%>         K ;
         +Sg+Gen:%>Q1         K ;
         +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v        K ;
         +Sg+Ill:%>j        K ;
         +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n        K ;
         +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s        K ;
         +Sg+Com:%>Q1jn       K ;
         	+Ess:%>n        K ;
         +Pl+Nom:%>Q1         K ;
         +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j        K ;
         +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt       K ;
         +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda      K ;
         +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn       K ;
         +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js       K ;
         +Pl+Com:%>Q1j        K ;
         
!    +Sg+Ine+Attr:ppán%>        K ; ! Spiik: "i attributiv ställning böjes det i allmänhet som demonstrative 
    +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>Q1         K ; !         pronomen, men med inessiv före inessiv..."
    +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>Q1t        K ;
         
 !       +Sg+Abe:ppá%>#da      K ;
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1#dak     K ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>#dagi    K ; ! 
  +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>#dagá    K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:%>Q1#tagá    K ; ! 
!        +Pl+Abe:ppá%>j#da     K ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dak    K ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagi   K ; ! 
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:%>Q1j#dagá   K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ppá%>j#tagá   K ; ! 

! possessive suffixes:
    +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>Q1         K ;
    +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>Q1        K ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu1:%>ma       K ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu2:%>da       K ;
   +Sg+Nom+PxDu3:%>ska      K ;
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:ppá%>        NAMÁK ; !  adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu1Q1:%>Q1ma       K ;
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu2Q1:%>Q1da       K ;
   +Sg+Gen+PxDu3Q1:%>Q1ska      K ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu1Q1:%>Q1ma       K ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu2Q1:%>Q1da       K ;
   +Sg+Acc+PxDu3Q1:%>Q1ska      K ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu1:%>simme    K ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu2:%>sihtte   K ;
   +Sg+Ill+PxDu3:%>siska    K ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu1:%>Q1nimme    K ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu2:%>Q1nihtte   K ;
   +Sg+Ine+PxDu3:%>Q1niska    K ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu1:%>Q1stimme   K ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu2:%>Q1stihtte  K ;
   +Sg+Ela+PxDu3:%>Q1stiska   K ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu1:%>Q1jnimme   K ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu2:%>Q1jnihtte  K ;
   +Sg+Com+PxDu3:%>Q1jniska   K ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu1:%>Q1ma       K ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu2:%>Q1da       K ;
   +Pl+Nom+PxDu3:%>Q1ska      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ppá%>j        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu1:%>Q1jimme    K ;
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu2:%>Q1jihtte   K ;
   +Pl+Gen+PxDu3:%>Q1jiska    K ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu1:%>Q1jdimme   K ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu2:%>Q1jdihtte  K ;
   +Pl+Acc+PxDu3:%>Q1jdiska   K ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu1:%>Q1jdisema  K ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu2:%>Q1jdiseda  K ;
   +Pl+Ill+PxDu3:%>Q1jdiseska K ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu1:%>Q1jnimme   K ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu2:%>Q1jnihtte  K ;
   +Pl+Ine+PxDu3:%>Q1jniska   K ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu1:%>Q1jstimme  K ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu2:%>Q1jstihtte K ;
   +Pl+Ela+PxDu3:%>Q1jstiska  K ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu1:%>Q1jimme    K ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu2:%>Q1jihtte   K ;
   +Pl+Com+PxDu3:%>Q1jiska    K ;

LEXICON foc-k
        +Nom:%>	 	 K-posneg ;
        +Gen:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
        +Acc:%>Q1    K-posneg ;
        +Ill:si%> 	 K-posneg ;
        +Ine:%>Q1ni  K-posneg ;
        +Ela:%>Q1sti K-posneg ;
        +Com:%>Q1jni K-posneg ;
        +Ess:ni%>	 K-posneg ;

LEXICON K-s ! Alternative clitic lexicon
 +Clt:s # ;
 # ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

LEXICON máŋŋgacase           
 +Sg+Gen:%>       K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>  K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;                
 +Sg+Acc:%>v      K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:%>n      K ; 
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:%>n K ;     
 +Sg+Ela:%>s      K ; 
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:%>t K ; 
 +Sg+Com:%>jn     K ;    
 +Sg+Par:%>t      K ;     

LEXICON ållocase  
 +Sg+Nom:%>     K ;         
 +Sg+Gen:%>Q1   K ;
! +Sg+Ill+Attr:%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X4j  K ;     
 +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s  K ;      
 +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n  K ;   
 +Sg+Com:%>Q1jn K ;         
 +Sg+Par:%>Q1t  K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Q1   K ; 
 +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j  K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt K ;      
 +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js K ;      
 +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn K ;   
 +Pl+Com:%>Q1j  K ;    
